Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-104
Nebraska State Historical Society; public documents, records, relics; custodian.

The Nebraska State Historical Society shall be the custodian of all public records, documents, relics, and other material which the society may consider to be of historic value or interest, and which may be in any of the offices or vaults of the several departments of the state, in any of the institutions which receive appropriations of money from the Legislature of Nebraska, or in any of the county courthouses, city halls, or other public buildings within the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1905, c. 157, § 1, p. 604;

R.S.1913, § 7169;

C.S.1922, § 6820;

C.S.1929, § 82-104;

R.S.1943, § 82-104.